Hawaii statutes.
[§353-122] Limitation on use of restraints. (a)
While transporting, no restraints of any kind may be used on any committed
female:

(1) During the third
trimester of her pregnancy;

(2) During postpartum
recovery; or

(3) During any portion of her pregnancy, if her physician so
orders;

except in extraordinary
circumstances.

(b) While the pregnant female
is in labor or in childbirth no restraints of any kind shall be used. Nothing
in this section affects the use of hospital restraints requested for the
medical safety of the patient by a treating physician.

(c) Any restraints used on a
pregnant female shall be the least restrictive available and the most
reasonable under the circumstances, but in no case shall leg irons or waist
chains be used on any pregnant female.

(d) No correctional
personnel shall be present in the room during the pregnant female's labor or
childbirth, unless specifically requested by medical personnel. If the correctional
personnel's presence is requested by medical personnel, the correctional
personnel shall be female, if practicable.

(e) If the doctor, nurse, or
other health professional treating the pregnant female requests that restraints
not be used, the corrections officer accompanying the pregnant female shall
immediately remove all restraints.

(f) For the purpose of this
section, "extraordinary circumstances" exist where a corrections
officer makes an individualized determination that restraints are necessary to
prevent an incarcerated pregnant female from escaping or injuring herself,
medical or correctional personnel, or others.

If a corrections officer
determines that extraordinary circumstances exist and restraints are used, the
corrections officer shall fully document in writing the facts upon which a
finding of extraordinary circumstances was based. The corrections officer
shall also include the kind of restraints used and the reasons those restraints
were considered the most reasonable and least restrictive available under the
circumstances. [L 2011, c 174, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next